California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 49.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.17.

The Governor shall appoint an Alarm Company Operator Disciplinary Review Committee.

The disciplinary review committee shall consist of three members who are actively engaged in business as licensed alarm company operators and two public members. The committee shall meet every 60 days, or more or less frequently as may be required. The members shall be paid per diem pursuant to Section 103 and shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses. The members shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1135, Sec. 10.4.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative March 1, 1993, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 1135.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.18.

(a) The Alarm Company Operator Disciplinary Review Committee shall perform the following functions:

(1) Affirm, rescind, or modify all appealed decisions concerning administrative fines assessed by the bureau against alarm company
 operators or their employees.

(2) Affirm, rescind, or modify all appealed decisions concerning denial, revocation, or suspension of licenses, and certificates, registrations, or permits issued by the bureau, except denials or suspensions ordered by the director in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The Alarm Company Operator Disciplinary Review Committee may grant a probationary license, certificate, registration, or permit with respect to the
 appealed decisions described in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 291, Sec. 7.   (SB 1077)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.19.

(a) (1) An alarm company operator, qualified manager, or alarm agent may request a review by the Alarm Company Operator Disciplinary Review Committee to contest the assessment of an administrative fine, unless the fine is assessed pursuant to Section 7591.13, or to appeal a denial, revocation, or suspension, unless the denial or suspension is ordered by the director in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code or in accordance with Section 7591.8 of this code.

(2) A request for a review shall be by written notice to the bureau within 30 days of the issuance of the citation and assessment, denial, or suspension.

(3) Following a review by the disciplinary review committee, the appellant shall be notified within 30 days, in writing, by regular mail, of the committee’s decision.

(4) If the appellant disagrees with the decision made by the Alarm Company Operator Disciplinary Review Committee, he or she may request a hearing as outlined in subdivision (b). A request for a hearing following a decision by the disciplinary review committee shall be by written notice to the bureau within 30 days of the committee’s decision.

(5) If the appellant does not request a hearing within 30 days, the review committee’s decision shall become final.

(b) (1) An alarm company operator, qualified manager, or alarm agent may request a hearing in accordance with
 Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code if he or she contests an assessment of an administrative fine, or to appeal a denial, suspension, or revocation. A hearing may also be requested if the appellant disagrees with the decision made by the Alarm Company Operator Disciplinary Review Committee.

(2) A request for a hearing shall be by written notice to the bureau within 30 days of the issuance of the decision by the review committee. A hearing pursuant to this subdivision shall be available only after a review by the disciplinary review committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 291, Sec. 8.   (SB 1077)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7591.20.

The disciplinary review committee shall be provided all evidence used by the bureau in reaching its decision prior to hearing an appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Application of Chapter [7592. - 7592.9.]

7592.

No person shall engage within this state in the activities of an alarm company operator as defined in Section 7590.2, unless the person holds a valid alarm company operator’s license or is exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7592.2.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, or who conspires with another person to violate any provision of this chapter, or who knowingly engages an unlicensed alarm company operator after being notified in writing by the bureau of the alarm company operator’s unlicensed status with the bureau, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7592.3.

Any person who engages in any business regulated by this chapter, who acts as or represents himself or herself to be a licensee under this chapter, who falsely represents that he or she is employed by a licensee, or who carries a badge, identification card, or business card, or uses a letterhead or advertises that he or she is a licensee under this chapter, unless such person is licensed under this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7592.5.

No person engaged in performing any service requiring a license under this chapter may bring or maintain any action in any court of this state for the collection of compensation for the performance of any act or agreement, without alleging and proving, that the person was duly licensed at all times during the performance of the act or agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7592.6.

Any person who knowingly falsifies fingerprints or photographs as required for any provisions of this chapter is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7592.8.

(a) The provisions of this chapter shall not prevent the local authorities of any city, county, or city and county, by ordinance and within the exercise of the police power of the city, county, or city and county from:

(1) Requiring alarm company operator licensees to meet the requirements for and obtain a business permit.

(2) Requiring alarm agents or alarm company operators, or both, to register their name and file a copy of their state issued identification card with the city, county, or city and county. No fee, other than a fee for a business license permit, may be charged nor may any
 application be required by the city, county, or city and county for that registration.

(3) (A) Enacting ordinances governing false alarm activations and responses.

(B) An alarm company operator or an alarm agent shall not be liable for civil penalties and fines assessed or imposed by a city, county, or city and county for false alarms not attributed to alarm company operator error, improper installation of the alarm system by an alarm agent or an alarm company operator, defective equipment provided or installed by an alarm agent or an alarm company operator, or defective equipment leased by an alarm company operator.

(4) Requiring persons who own, lease, rent, or otherwise possess an
 alarm system to obtain a permit to operate the alarm system.

(b) This section shall not be construed to affect the authority of a city, county, or city and county to adopt and enforce ordinances requiring alarm companies to attempt to verify alarm events before requesting dispatch. 

(c) Except as otherwise required to comply with this chapter, this section shall not be construed to require the bureau to investigate,
 hear, or adjudicate a cause of action between an alarm company and a city, county, or city and county that pertains to liability for penalties imposed under an ordinance enacted by the city, county, or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 157, Sec. 1.   (AB 1616)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7592.9.

Notwithstanding Section 7592.8, a city, county, or city and county that requires a person who owns, leases, rents, or otherwise possesses an alarm system to obtain a local use permit to operate the alarm system shall not fine an alarm company for requesting dispatch to a customer, whether residential or commercial, that does not have a current local use permit if either apply:

(a) It was not the alarm company’s legal responsibility to obtain the local use permit for the customer or renew the local use permit for the customer.

(b) If it is the alarm company’s legal responsibility to renew the local use permit for the customer, the alarm
 company was not notified that the customer’s local use permit had expired.

(c) Except as otherwise required by this chapter, this section shall not be construed to require the bureau to investigate, hear, or adjudicate a cause of action between an alarm company and a city, county, or city and county that pertains to liability for penalties imposed under an ordinance enacted by the city, county, or city and county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 22.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Licenses [7593. - 7593.16.]

7593.

An application for an alarm company operator license shall be made in writing to, and filed with, the chief in the form that may be required by the director and shall be accompanied by the original license fee prescribed by this chapter. The chief may require the submission of any other relevant information, evidence, statements, or documents.

Every application for an alarm company operator license shall state, among other things that may be required, the name of the applicant with the name under which the applicant will do business, and the location by street and number, and city of the office of the business for which the license is sought. All information obtained on the application shall be confidential pursuant to the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) and shall not be released to the public except for the registrant’s full name, the employer’s name and address, and the registration number. Nothing in this section shall preclude the release of information to the public regarding the status of an operator’s license, or the release of information to law enforcement agencies or other governmental agencies for other authorized purposes.

No license shall be issued in any fictitious name which may be confused with or which is similar to any federal, state, county, or municipal governmental function or agency or to any law enforcement agency, or in any name which may tend to describe any business function or enterprise not actually engaged in by the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 359, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7593.1.

(a) Each individual applicant, partner of a partnership, designated officer of a corporation, member, officer, or manager of a limited liability company, and a qualified manager shall submit with the application one personal identification form provided by the chief, with two legible sets of fingerprints, one set of which shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of a background check, and personal description of each such person, respectively. The identification form shall include residence addresses and employment history for the previous five years.

(b) The bureau may impose a fee not to exceed three dollars ($3) for processing classifiable fingerprint cards submitted by applicants excluding those submitted into an electronic
 fingerprint system using electronic fingerprint technology.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 38) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 43.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 44 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 484.)
-------------------------------------------

7593.1.

(a) Each individual applicant, partner of a partnership, designated officer of a corporation, and a qualified manager shall submit with the application, one personal identification form provided by the chief, with two legible sets of fingerprints, one set of which shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of a background check, and personal description of each such person, respectively. The identification form shall include residence addresses and employment history for the previous five years.

(b) The bureau may impose a fee not to exceed three dollars ($3) for processing classifiable fingerprint cards submitted by applicants excluding those submitted into an electronic fingerprint system using electronic fingerprint technology.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 625, Sec. 39) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 44.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7593.2.

If the applicant for license is an individual, the application shall state the full name of the individual, the full residence address of the applicant, and that the applicant is to be personally and actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought; or if any other qualified manager is to be actively in charge of the business, the application shall so state and set forth the name of that person. The application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed by the applicant, under penalty of perjury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 876, Sec. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

7593.3.

If the applicants for license are copartners, the application shall state the true names and addresses of all the general partners and the name of the partner to be actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought; or if a qualified manager other than a partner is to be actively in charge of the business then the application shall state the name and address of that person. The application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed under penalty of perjury by all of the general partners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 876, Sec. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

7593.4.

If the applicant for license is a corporation, the application shall state the true names and complete residence addresses of the chief executive officer, secretary, chief financial officer, and any other corporate officer who will be active in the business to be licensed. A copy of the articles of incorporation issued by the Secretary of State shall be supplied to the bureau upon request. The application shall also state the name and address of the designated person to be actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought. The application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed by a duly authorized officer of the applicant under penalty of perjury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 876, Sec. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

7593.5.

(a) If the applicant for a license is a limited liability company, the application shall state the true names and complete residence addresses of each member, manager, and any other officer who will be active in the business to be licensed. A copy of the articles of organization issued by the Secretary of State shall be supplied to the bureau upon request. The application shall also state the name and address of the designated person to be actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought. The application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed by a duly authorized member of the applicant under penalty of perjury.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is
 repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 45.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7593.6.

(a) The director may refuse to issue a license to an applicant pending final disposition of an investigation of criminal activity or of a disciplinary action previously filed against the person or applicant or against a qualified manager, partner, member, manager, or officer of the applicant.

(b) A new alarm company operator license, qualified manager certificate, or alarm agent registration shall be subject to payment of any and all fines assessed pursuant to this section and not resolved in accordance with the provisions of this section and payment of all applicable fees.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 140, Sec. 7) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 406, Sec. 13.   (SB 904)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7593.7.

The chief shall issue a pocket identification card to the owner; any partner, officer, member, or manager active in the licensed business; and qualified manager. The chief shall determine the form and content of the card.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 25.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7593.8.

The director shall issue a license, the form and content of which shall be determined in accordance with Section 164. In addition, the director shall issue a “Certificate of Licensure” to any licensee, upon request, with the fee prescribed in this chapter. A “certificate of licensure” shall include an embossed seal of the State of California and the signature of the chief or his or her designated representative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7593.9.

Each alarm company operator license, together with the current renewal certificate, if any, shall at all times be conspicuously displayed at the place of business for which the license is issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7593.11.

An alarm company operator license issued under this chapter expires at midnight on the last day of the month two years following the date of issuance unless renewed. To renew an unexpired license or certificate, the licensee shall apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the director, pay all fines assessed pursuant to Section 7591.9 and not resolved in accordance with the provisions of that section, and pay the renewal fee. On renewal, evidence of renewal of the license or certificate that the director may prescribe shall be issued to the licensee. The bureau shall send to each licensee a notice of renewal at least 45 calendar days prior to the expiration of each license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 39.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7593.12.

An alarm company operator’s license not renewed within three years following its expiration may not be renewed thereafter. Renewal of the license within one year, or issuance of an original license thereafter, shall be subject to payment of any and all fines assessed pursuant to Section 7591.9 and not resolved in accordance with the provisions of that section and payment of all applicable fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 19.5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7593.13.

A suspended alarm company operator license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but renewal of the license does not entitle the licensee, while the license remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7593.14.

An alarm company operator whose license has been canceled pursuant to this article, may obtain a new license only upon compliance with all of the provisions of this chapter relating to the issuance of an initial license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7593.15.

(a) Except as provided in this section, an alarm company operator license issued under this chapter is not assignable.

(b) An alarm company operator may apply to the chief for consent and, upon receipt of the consent and payment of the processing fee authorized by Section 7599.70, may assign a license to another business entity as long as the direct and indirect owners of the assignor own all of the assignee immediately after the assignment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 291, Sec. 16.   (SB 1077)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7593.16.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director may, in his or her sole discretion, grant a probationary license, certificate, registration, or permit to an applicant subject to terms and conditions deemed appropriate by the director, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Continuing medical, psychiatric, or psychological treatment.

(2) Ongoing participation in a specified rehabilitation program.

(3) Abstention from the use of alcohol or drugs.

(4) Compliance with all provisions of this chapter.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and for purposes of this section, when deciding whether to grant a probationary license, certificate, registration, or permit, the director shall request that an applicant with a dismissed conviction provide proof of that dismissal and shall give special consideration to applicants whose convictions have been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4 or 1203.4a of the Penal Code.

(2) The director shall also take into account and consider any other reasonable documents or individual character references provided by the applicant that may serve as evidence of rehabilitation as deemed appropriate by the director.

(c) The director may modify or terminate the terms and conditions imposed on the probationary license, certificate, registration, or permit
 upon receipt of a petition from the applicant or licensee, certificate holder, registrant, or permitholder.

(d) For purposes of granting a probationary license, certificate, registration, or permit to qualified new applicants, the director shall develop standard terms of probation that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) A three-year limit on the individual probationary license, certificate, registration, or permit.

(2) A process to obtain a standard license, certificate, registration, or permit for applicants who were issued a probationary license, certificate, registration, or permit.

(3) Supervision requirements.

(4) Compliance and quarterly reporting
 requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 291, Sec. 17.   (SB 1077)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Licensed and Registered Locations [7594. - 7594.6.]

7594.

A licensee desiring to operate an alarm company operator business under one or more fictitious trade names shall apply and qualify for an initial license for each fictitious trade name.

No licensee shall indicate, or cause to be indicated, in any printed matter, or in any directory or listing, that he or she conducts an alarm company operator business under any name, other than the name for which he or she is licensed. 

An application for a license for an additional trade name shall be in the same form and the applicant shall meet the same requirements as for an initial license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7594.1.

A licensee desiring to operate an alarm company operator business at a location other than the principal place of business as shown on the license shall apply for a branch office registration for each additional location as set forth in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7594.2.

Every licensed business, including registered branch offices, shall be under the active charge of a qualified manager. Every licensed registered branch office shall be managed by a designated branch office manager as set forth in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

7594.3.

(a) Whenever a qualified manager ceases to be in active charge of the business, the license shall be automatically suspended within 30 days unless the licensee notifies the bureau within the 30-day period of such cessation.

(b) Whenever a designated branch office manager ceases management of a registered branch office, the branch office registration shall be automatically suspended within 30 days unless the qualified manager notifies the bureau within the 30-day period of such cessation.

(c) If the notice of cessation is filed timely, the license or branch office registration shall remain in force for a period of 90 days after cessation or for an additional period, not to exceed one year, as specified by the director. After the 90-day period or additional period, as approved by the director, the license or branch office registration shall be automatically suspended, unless the bureau receives written notification that the license is under the active charge of a qualified manager or that a branch office manager has been designated.

A license or branch office registration suspended under this section may be reinstated only upon the filing of an application for reinstatement, payment of the reinstatement fee, and the qualification of a manager as provided by this chapter.

A person who performs any act for which an alarm company operator license is required during the period of a suspension is subject to the penal provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 7592), in addition to any other provisions of this chapter.

(d) In case of the death of a person licensed as an individual, a member of the immediate family of the deceased licensee shall be entitled to continue the business under the same license for 120 days following the death of the licensee, provided that written notification is made to the bureau within 30 days following the death of the licensee. At the end of the 120-day period, the license shall be automatically canceled. If no request is received within the 30-day period, the license shall be automatically canceled at the end of that period.

(e) In the case of the death or disassociation of a partner of an entity licensed as a partnership, the licensee shall notify the bureau, in writing, within 30 days from the death or disassociation of the individual. If notice is given, the license shall remain in force for 90 days following the death or disassociation. At the end of such period the license shall be automatically canceled. If the licensee fails to notify the bureau within the 30-day period, the license shall be automatically canceled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 876, Sec. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

7594.4.

Except as herein otherwise provided, no individual shall be in active charge of the business if the individual has ever had a license revoked for cause or has ever been disqualified from further employment in the alarm company operator business pursuant to this chapter, or was a qualified manager, partner, member, manager, or officer of a business whose license has been revoked.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 140, Sec. 11) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 406, Sec. 17.   (SB 904)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7594.5.

(a) The business of each licensee shall be operated under the active direction, control, charge, or management, in this state, of the licensee, if he or she is qualified, or the person who is qualified and certified to act as the licensee’s qualified manager, if the licensee is not qualified.

(b) The individual deemed to be actively in charge of the business shall be the qualified manager, as defined in this chapter, and the certificate of the qualified manager shall be prominently displayed below the alarm company operator’s license.
 The individual shall share equally with the licensee the responsibility for compliance with this chapter.

(c) The director may assess fines for any violations as enumerated in this article, pursuant to Section 7591.9. Fines may be assessed against an alarm company operator’s license or a qualified manager’s certificate, or both, as deemed appropriate by the director.

(d) Assessment of the administrative fines shall be independent of any other action by the bureau or any local, state, or federal governmental agency which may result from a violation of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 406, Sec. 19.   (SB 904)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7594.6.

The designated branch office manager shall spend an average of 51 percent of the usual business hours in the conduct of the business at the registered branch office location under the active management and supervision of the qualified manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1210, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Firearms Permits and Permits for Other Deadly and Nonlethal Weapons [7596. - 7596.13.]

7596.

(a) Every person licensed, registered, or designated under this chapter, who in the course of their employment carries a firearm, shall complete a course of training in the carrying and use of firearms and shall receive a firearms qualification card prior to the carrying of such a firearm and shall complete a course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force. A registration card issued by the bureau pursuant to Section 7598.14 may also serve as a firearms qualification card if so indicated on the face of the card.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 697, Sec. 24) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 45.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7596.3.

The director shall issue a firearms permit when all of the following conditions exist:

(a) The applicant is a licensee, a qualified manager of a licensee, a designated branch office manager of a licensee, or a registered alarm agent. A firearms permit may only be associated with the following:

(1) A sole owner of a sole ownership licensee.

(2) A partner of a partnership licensee.

(3) A qualified manager of a licensee.

(4) A designated branch office manager of a licensee.

(5) A registered alarm agent.

(b) The applicant has filed with the bureau a classifiable fingerprint card, a completed application for a firearms permit on a form prescribed by the director, dated and signed by the applicant, certifying under penalty of perjury that the information in the application is true and correct. In lieu of a classifiable fingerprint card, the applicant may submit fingerprints into an electronic fingerprinting system administered by the Department of Justice. An applicant who submits their fingerprints by electronic means shall have their fingerprints entered into the system through a terminal operated by a law enforcement agency or other facility authorized by the Department of Justice to conduct electronic fingerprinting. The terminal operator may charge a fee sufficient to reimburse it for the costs incurred in providing this service.

(c) (1) A bureau-certified firearms training instructor certifies that the applicant has successfully completed a written examination prepared by the bureau and a training course in the carrying and use of firearms approved by the bureau.

(2) An applicant who is a bureau-certified firearms training instructor is prohibited from self-certifying as having successfully carried out the requirement of paragraph (1) and shall instead carry out the requirements under another bureau-certified firearms training instructor.

(d) The applicant has provided the bureau with evidence that the applicant has completed a course in the exercise of the power to arrest and the appropriate use of force.

(e) The applicant is at least 21 years of age and the bureau has determined, after investigation, that
 the carrying and use of a firearm by the applicant, in the course of their duties, presents no apparent threat to the public safety, or the carrying and use of a firearm by the applicant is not in violation of the Penal Code.

(f) The applicant has produced evidence to the firearm training facility that the applicant is a citizen of the United States or has permanent legal immigration status in the United States. Evidence of citizenship or permanent legal immigration status shall be that deemed sufficient by the bureau to ensure compliance with federal laws prohibiting possession of firearms by persons unlawfully in the United States and may include, but not be limited to, Department of Justice, Immigration and Naturalization Service Form I-151 or United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Form I-551 (Permanent Resident Card), naturalization documents, or birth certificates evidencing lawful residence or status in the United States.

(g) The application is accompanied by the fee prescribed in this chapter.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 697, Sec. 26.5) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 47.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7596.4.

(a) (1) If a firearms permit is denied, the denial of the permit shall be in writing and shall describe the basis for the denial. The denial shall inform the applicant that if he or she desires a review by the Alarm Company Operator Disciplinary Review Committee, the review shall be requested within 30 days of the issuance of the denial.

(2) A review or hearing shall be held pursuant to Section 7591.19. However, no review or hearing shall be granted to an individual who is otherwise prohibited by law from carrying a firearm.

(b) (1) If a firearms permit is denied on the basis of the results of an assessment required for a permit associated with a security
 guard registration pursuant to Section 7583.47, the denial shall be in writing and shall describe the basis for the denial. The denial shall inform the applicant that if he or she desires to contest the denial, the applicant shall request a hearing within 30 days of the issuance of the denial.

(2) Appeals of denials pursuant to this subdivision shall be in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 5.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

7596.5.

(a) The firearms qualification card shall be mailed to the applicant at the address that appears on the application.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 50) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 51.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7596.6.

A firearms qualification card does not authorize the holder thereof to carry a pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person in a concealed manner pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, 26170, or 26215 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 10.   (SB 1115)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 107 of Ch. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

7596.7.

A firearms qualification card expires two years from the date of issuance, if not renewed. A person who wishes to renew a firearms qualification card shall file an application for renewal at least 60 days prior to the card’s expiration. A person whose card has expired shall not carry a firearm until the person has been issued a renewal card by the bureau.

The director shall not renew a firearms qualification card unless all of the following conditions exist:

(a) The cardholder has filed with the bureau a completed application for renewal of a firearms qualification card, on a form prescribed by the director, dated and signed by the applicant under penalty of
 perjury certifying that the information on the application is true and correct.

(b) The application is accompanied by a firearms requalification fee as prescribed in this chapter.

(c) (1) The applicant has requalified on the range and has successfully passed a written examination based on course content as specified in the firearms training manual approved by the department and taught at a training facility approved by the bureau.

(2) An applicant who is a bureau-certified firearms training instructor is prohibited from self-certifying as having successfully carried out the
 requirements of paragraph (1) and shall instead carry out the requirements under another bureau-certified firearms
 training instructor.

(d) The applicant has produced evidence to the firearm training facility, either upon receiving an original qualification card or upon filing for renewal of that card, that the applicant is a citizen of the United States or has permanent legal immigration status in the United States. Evidence of citizenship or permanent legal immigration status is that deemed sufficient by the bureau to ensure compliance with federal laws prohibiting possession of firearms by
 persons unlawfully in the United States and may include, but not be limited to, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Form I-551 (Permanent Resident Card), naturalization documents, or birth certificates evidencing lawful residence or status in the United States.

(e) An expired firearms qualification card may not be renewed. A person with an expired firearms qualification card is required to apply for a new card in the manner required of persons not previously registered. A person whose card has expired shall not carry a firearm until the person has been issued a new firearms qualification card by the
 bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 27.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7596.8.

(a) The bureau shall not issue a firearm permit if the applicant is prohibited from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm pursuant to state or federal law.

(b) Before issuing an initial firearm permit the bureau shall provide the Department of Justice with the name, address, social security number, and fingerprints of the applicant.
